apertium-mal-eng_jan27/dev/avar.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- അവര്‍; അവര; 7 -->
    <pardef n="അവര/്‍__prn">
      <e>       <p><l>്‍</l><r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>െ</l><r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ുടെ</l><r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>്‍ക്ക്</l><r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ാല്‍</l><r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>േ</l><r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ോട്</l><r>്‍<s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="അവര്‍"><i>അവര</i><par n="അവര/്‍__prn"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
